Tennessee, session 114, SB1761.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 43-27-102(c), is amended by
deleting "five (5) years" and substituting "ten (10) years".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1761
010675
- 1 -